Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB579.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Kentucky Building Code shall permit less than six (6) stories of Residential Group
R-2 occupancy, as defined in the building code, to be served by a single exit if:
(1) The building does not:
(a) Have more than six (6) stories above grade plane; and
(b) Contain more than four (4) dwelling units on any floor;
(2) An exterior or interior stairway is provided;
(3) (a) A corridor separates each dwelling unit entry or exit door from the door to
an interior exit stairway, including any related exit passageway on each
floor; and
(b) The dwelling unit doors do not open directly into an interior exit stairway,
but may open directly into an exterior stairway;
(4) There is no more than twenty (20) feet of travel to the exit stairway from the entry
or exit door of any dwelling unit;
(5) Travel distance measured in accordance with the building code does not exceed
one hundred twenty-five (125) feet;
(6) Other occupancies in the same building do not have access to the Residential
Group R-2 occupancy portion of the building or with the single-exit stairway.
This shall not include parking garages and occupied roofs that are part of the
Residential Group R-2 occupancy that may have access to the exit stairway;
(7) The exit serving the Residential Group R-2 occupancy does not discharge
through any other occupancy, including an attached parking garage; and
(8) There are no openings within ten (10) feet of unprotected openings into the
stairway other than required exit doors having a one (1) hour fire-resistance
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/8/2025 2:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1101
rating.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/8/2025 2:13 PM Jacketed